Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,132
Vehicles proceeding in opposite direction; passing.

Passing vehicles proceeding in opposite directions shall each keep to the right side of the roadway, passing left to left, and upon roadways having width for not more than one lane of traffic in each direction, each driver shall give to the other, as nearly as possible, at least one-half of the main-traveled portion of the roadway.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 21;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-621;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 228.